District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
resolution may be cited as the “Rental Housing Registration Extension Emergency Declaration
Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) On June 2nd, 2025, the new DC RentRegistry will go live, and housing
providers will be required to submit all documentation under § 42–3502.03c of the Code of the
District of Columbia within 90 days of the database becoming accessible to housing providers.
Whereas housing providers are required to enter additional information into DHCD’s online
database within 90 days, more time is needed to mitigate administrative burdens and ensure that
housing providers can provide this documentation in compliance with statute.
(b)Within 90 days after completion of the publicly accessible rent control housing
database created pursuant to §42-3502.03c, section (f)(1) of §42–3502.05 requires housing
providers to file a new registration statement and, if applicable, a new claim of exemption for
housing accommodation for which the housing provider is receiving rent or is entitled to receive
rent via the online housing provider portal developed pursuant to §42-3502.03c(e-1);

(c) The Rental Accommodations Division has been informed by housing industry
stakeholders that housing providers do not understand the new requirements and need additional
time to ensure compliance;
(d) Some housing providers of exempt rental accommodations have expressed concern
that the Rent Administrator lacks the authority to require submission of current rent and rent
amounts from the previous two calendar years, and argue that this requirement is burdensome;
however, this rent history data is essential to providing a comprehensive snapshot of the
District’s rental market and will only be required at the time of registration—not on a recurring
basis. Clarifying this requirement on an emergency basis will reduce confusion, strengthen legal
authority for its collection, and support full functionality of the RentRegistry system at launch;
(e) With the amount of information required for entry into the RentRegistry, housing
providers will need more than 90 days to adjust their business practices and staffing needs to
ensure all requirements under §42–3502.03c are met;
(f) Given that the RentRegistry will not contain any information previously submitted to
the Rental Accommodations Division prior to June 2, 2025, housing providers, especially those
operating larger or multiple properties, will need additional time to compile and enter all the
information required under information §42–3502.03c.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia determines that the circumstances
enumerated in section 2 constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the
Housing Provider RentRegistry Registration Deadline Extension Emergency Declaration
Resolution of 2025 be adopted after a single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.